Washington statutes.
RCW 25.05.350

Definitions.

The definitions in this article [section] apply throughout this article unless the context clearly requires otherwise:

(1) "General partner" means a partner in a partnership and a general partner in a limited partnership.

(2) "Limited partner" means a limited partner in a limited partnership.

(3) "Limited partnership" means a limited partnership created under the Washington uniform limited partnership act, predecessor law, or comparable law of another jurisdiction.

(4) "Partner" includes both a general partner and a limited partner.

[ 1998 c 103 s 901.]